Illinois, session 104th, HB5708.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. In addition to other sums appropriated, the sum 5of $573,827,400, or so much thereof as may be necessary, is 6appropriated from the General Revenue Fund to the Supreme 7Court for operational expenses, awards, grants, permanent 8improvements, and probation reimbursements for the fiscal year 9ending June 30, 2027. 10    Section 10. The sum of $29,131,200, or so much thereof as 11may be necessary, is appropriated from the Mandatory 12Arbitration Fund to the Supreme Court for Mandatory 13Arbitration Programs. 14    Section 15. The sum of $708,800, or so much thereof as may 15be necessary, is appropriated from the Foreign Language 16Interpreter Fund to the Supreme Court for the Foreign Language 17Interpreter Program. 18    Section 20. The sum of $20,793,900, or so much thereof as 19may be necessary, is appropriated from the Supreme Court 20Special Purposes Fund to the Supreme Court for the oversight 21and management of electronic filing, case management systems,   HB5708- 2 -LRB104 20446 JRC 33911 b1and committees and commissions of the Supreme Court. 2    Section 25. The sum of $10,000,000, or so much thereof as 3may be necessary, is appropriated from the Supreme Court 4Federal Projects Fund to the Supreme Court for expenses 5relating to various federal projects. 6    Section 30. The sum of $6,000,000, or so much thereof as 7may be necessary, is appropriated from the Supreme Court 8Special State Projects Fund to the Supreme Court for expenses 9relating to various state projects. 10    Section 35. The sum of $1,000,000, or so much thereof as 11may be necessary, is appropriated from the Supreme Court 12Indirect Cost Fund to the Supreme Court for various 13administrative expenses. 14    Section 40. The amount of $500,000, or so much thereof as 15may be necessary, is appropriated from the Cannabis 16Expungement Fund to the Supreme Court for the distribution to 17clerks of the circuit court for the facilitation of petitions 18of expungement of minor cannabis offenses pursuant to the 19Cannabis Regulation and Tax Act. 20    Section 45. The sum of $5,000,000, or so much thereof as 21may be necessary, is appropriated from the Mandatory   HB5708- 3 -LRB104 20446 JRC 33911 b1Arbitration Fund to the Supreme Court for reduction of case 2backlogs and managing increases in case filings, modernizing 3court technology infrastructure and Supporting Access to 4Justice Programs. 5    Section 50. The sum of $10,000,000, or so much thereof as 6may be necessary, is appropriated from the Public Defender 7Fund to the Supreme Court to provide funding to counties for 8public defenders and public defender services. 9    Section 99. Effective date. This Act takes effect July 1, 102026.